Florida, session 2026, SB1660.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSection 683.338, Florida Statutes, is created to 13 read: 14 683.338âResponsible Firearm Safety Awareness Month.â 15 (1)âThe Legislature designates the month of June as 16 âResponsible Firearm Safety Awareness Monthâ to recognize the 17 importance of safe and responsible firearm use and ownership, 18 while honoring the guarantees of the Second Amendment to the 19 United States Constitution and of s. 8, Art. I of the State 20 Constitution. 21 (2)âThe Department of Law Enforcement, local governments, 22 and other agencies and organizations are encouraged to sponsor 23 events that promote public awareness on the dangers of firearms 24 and educate the public through voluntary training and safety 25 demonstrations. 26 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.